3rdParty/snowball/algorithms/hindi.sbl
// An implementation of "A Lightweight Stemmer for Hindi":
// http://www.kbcs.in/downloads/papers/StmmerHindi.pdf

externals ( stem )

stringescapes {}

// The transliteration scheme used for our stringdefs matches that used in the
// paper, as documented in the appendix.  It appears to match the WX notation
// (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/WX_notation) except that WX apparently
// uses 'z' for Anunasika whereas the paper uses Mh.
//
// We discriminate dependent vowels by adding a leading "_" to their stringdef
// names (mnemonic: the _ signifies removing the implicit a from the preceding
// character).

// Vowels and sonorants:
stringdef a  '{U+0905}'
stringdef A  '{U+0906}'
stringdef i  '{U+0907}'
stringdef I  '{U+0908}'
stringdef u  '{U+0909}'
stringdef U  '{U+090A}'
stringdef q  '{U+090B}'
stringdef e  '{U+090F}'
stringdef E  '{U+0910}'
stringdef o  '{U+0913}'
stringdef O  '{U+0914}'

// Vowel signs:
stringdef _A '{U+093E}'
stringdef _i '{U+093F}'
stringdef _I '{U+0940}'
stringdef _u '{U+0941}'
stringdef _U '{U+0942}'
stringdef _q '{U+0943}'
stringdef _e '{U+0947}'
stringdef _E '{U+0948}'
stringdef _o '{U+094B}'
stringdef _O '{U+094C}'

// Diacritics:
stringdef M  '{U+0902}'
stringdef H  '{U+0903}'
stringdef Mh '{U+0901}'
stringdef Z  '{U+093C}' // Nukta
stringdef virama '{U+094D}'

// Velar consonants:
stringdef k  '{U+0915}'
stringdef K  '{U+0916}'
stringdef g  '{U+0917}'
stringdef G  '{U+0918}'
stringdef f  '{U+0919}'

// Palatal consonants:
stringdef c  '{U+091A}'
stringdef C  '{U+091B}'
stringdef j  '{U+091C}'
stringdef J  '{U+091D}'
stringdef F  '{U+091E}'

// Retroflex consonants:
stringdef t  '{U+091F}'
stringdef T  '{U+0920}'
stringdef d  '{U+0921}'
stringdef D  '{U+0922}'
stringdef N  '{U+0923}'

// Dental consonants:
stringdef w  '{U+0924}'
stringdef W  '{U+0925}'
stringdef x  '{U+0926}'
stringdef X  '{U+0927}'
stringdef n  '{U+0928}'

// Labial consonants:
stringdef p  '{U+092A}'
stringdef P  '{U+092B}'
stringdef b  '{U+092C}'
stringdef B  '{U+092D}'
stringdef m  '{U+092E}'

// Semi-vowels:
stringdef y  '{U+092F}'
stringdef r  '{U+0930}'
stringdef l  '{U+0932}'
stringdef v  '{U+0935}'

// Fricatives:
stringdef S  '{U+0936}'
stringdef R  '{U+0937}'
stringdef s  '{U+0938}'
stringdef h  '{U+0939}'

stringdef lY '{U+0933}'

// Precomposed characters - letters + nukta:
stringdef nZ '{U+0929}' // ≡ {n}{Z}
stringdef rZ '{U+0931}' // ≡ {r}{Z}
stringdef lYZ '{U+0934}' // ≡ {lY}{Z}
stringdef kZ '{U+0958}' // ≡ {k}{Z}
stringdef KZ '{U+0959}' // ≡ {K}{Z}
stringdef gZ '{U+095A}' // ≡ {g}{Z}
stringdef jZ '{U+095B}' // ≡ {j}{Z}
stringdef dZ '{U+095C}' // ≡ {d}{Z}
stringdef DZ '{U+095D}' // ≡ {D}{Z}
stringdef PZ '{U+095E}' // ≡ {P}{Z}
stringdef yZ '{U+095F}' // ≡ {y}{Z}

groupings ( consonant )

routines ( CONSONANT )

define consonant '{k}{K}{g}{G}{f}' +
                 '{c}{C}{j}{J}{F}' +
                 '{t}{T}{d}{D}{N}' +
                 '{w}{W}{x}{X}{n}' +
                 '{p}{P}{b}{B}{m}' +
                 '{y}{r}{l}{v}' +
                 '{S}{R}{s}{h}' +
                 '{lY}' +
                 '{Z}' + // Nukta
                 // Precomposed characters - letter and nukta:
                 '{nZ}{rZ}{lYZ}{kZ}{KZ}{gZ}{jZ}{dZ}{DZ}{PZ}{yZ}'

backwardmode ( define CONSONANT as ( consonant ) )

define stem as (
    // We assume in this implementation that the whole word doesn't count
    // as a valid suffix to remove, so we remove the longest suffix from
    // the list which leaves at least one character.  This change affects
    // 47 words out of the 65,140 in the sample vocabulary from Hindi
    // wikipedia.
    //
    // The trick here is we use `next` in forward mode to advance the cursor
    // to the second character, then `backwards` swaps the cursor and limit.
    next
    backwards (
        [substring] among (
            // The list below is derived from figure 3 in the paper.
            //
            // We perform the stemming on the Devanagari characters rather than
            // transliterating to Latin, so we have adapted the list below to
            // reflect this by converting suffixes back to Devanagari as
            // follows:
            //
            // * within the suffixes, "a" after a consonant is dropped since
            //   consonants have an implicit "a".
            //
            // * within the suffixes, a vowel other than "a" after a consonant
            //   is a dependent vowel (vowel sign); a vowel (including "a")
            //   after a non-consonant is an independent vowel.
            //
            // * to allow the vowel at the start of each suffix being dependent
            //   or independent, we include each suffix twice.  For the
            //   dependent version, a leading "a" is dropped and we check that
            //   the suffix is preceded by a consonant (which will have an
            //   implicit "a").
            //
            // * we add '{a}', which is needed for the example given right at
            //   the end of section 5 to work (conflating BarawIya and
            //   BarawIyawA), and which 3.1 a.v strongly suggests should be in
            //   the list:
            //
            //     Thus, the following suffix deletions (longest possible
            //     match) are required to reduce inflected forms of masculine
            //     nouns to a common stem:
            //     a A i [...]
            //
            //   Adding '{a}' only affect 2 words out of the 65,140 in the
            //   sample vocabulary.
            //
            // * The transliterations of our stems would end with "a" when our
            //   stems end in a consonant, so we also include {virama} in the
            //   list of suffixes to remove (this affects 222 words from the
            //   sample vocabulary).
            //
            // We've also assumed that Mh in the suffix list always means {Mh}
            // and never {M}{h}{virama}.  Only one of the 65,140 words in the
            // sample vocabulary stems differently due to this (and that word
            // seems to be a typo).

            '{virama}'

            '{a}'
            '{A}'
            '{i}'
            '{I}'
            '{u}'
            '{U}'
            '{e}'
            '{o}'
            '{e}{M}'
            '{o}{M}'
            '{A}{M}'
            '{u}{A}{M}'
            '{u}{e}{M}'
            '{u}{o}{M}'
            '{A}{e}{M}'
            '{A}{o}{M}'
            '{i}{y}{_A}{M}'
            '{i}{y}{_o}{M}'
            '{A}{i}{y}{_A}{M}'
            '{A}{i}{y}{_o}{M}'
            '{A}{Mh}'
            '{i}{y}{_A}{Mh}'
            '{A}{i}{y}{_A}{Mh}'
            '{a}{w}{_A}{e}{M}'
            '{a}{w}{_A}{o}{M}'
            '{a}{n}{_A}{e}{M}'
            '{a}{n}{_A}{o}{M}'
            '{a}{w}{_A}'
            '{a}{w}{_I}'
            '{I}{M}'
            '{a}{w}{_I}{M}'
            '{a}{w}{_e}'
            '{A}{w}{_A}'
            '{A}{w}{_I}'
            '{A}{w}{_I}{M}'
            '{A}{w}{_e}'
            '{a}{n}{_A}'
            '{a}{n}{_I}'
            '{a}{n}{_e}'
            '{A}{n}{_A}'
            '{A}{n}{_e}'
            '{U}{M}{g}{_A}'
            '{U}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{A}{U}{M}{g}{_A}'
            '{A}{U}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{e}{M}{g}{_e}'
            '{e}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{A}{e}{M}{g}{_e}'
            '{A}{e}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{o}{g}{_e}'
            '{o}{g}{_I}'
            '{A}{o}{g}{_e}'
            '{A}{o}{g}{_I}'
            '{e}{g}{_A}'
            '{e}{g}{_I}'
            '{A}{e}{g}{_A}'
            '{A}{e}{g}{_I}'
            '{A}{y}{_A}'
            '{A}{e}'
            '{A}{I}'
            '{A}{I}{M}'
            '{i}{e}'
            '{A}{o}'
            '{A}{i}{e}'
            '{a}{k}{r}'
            '{A}{k}{r}'

            '{_A}'
            '{_i}'
            '{_I}'
            '{_u}'
            '{_U}'
            '{_e}'
            '{_o}'
            '{_e}{M}'
            '{_o}{M}'
            '{_A}{M}'
            '{_u}{A}{M}'
            '{_u}{e}{M}'
            '{_u}{o}{M}'
            '{_A}{e}{M}'
            '{_A}{o}{M}'
            '{_i}{y}{_A}{M}'
            '{_i}{y}{_o}{M}'
            '{_A}{i}{y}{_A}{M}'
            '{_A}{i}{y}{_o}{M}'
            '{_A}{Mh}'
            '{_i}{y}{_A}{Mh}'
            '{_A}{i}{y}{_A}{Mh}'
            '{_I}{M}'
            '{_A}{w}{_A}'
            '{_A}{w}{_I}'
            '{_A}{w}{_I}{M}'
            '{_A}{w}{_e}'
            '{_A}{n}{_A}'
            '{_A}{n}{_e}'
            '{_U}{M}{g}{_A}'
            '{_U}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{_A}{U}{M}{g}{_A}'
            '{_A}{U}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{_e}{M}{g}{_e}'
            '{_e}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{_A}{e}{M}{g}{_e}'
            '{_A}{e}{M}{g}{_I}'
            '{_o}{g}{_e}'
            '{_o}{g}{_I}'
            '{_A}{o}{g}{_e}'
            '{_A}{o}{g}{_I}'
            '{_e}{g}{_A}'
            '{_e}{g}{_I}'
            '{_A}{e}{g}{_A}'
            '{_A}{e}{g}{_I}'
            '{_A}{y}{_A}'
            '{_A}{e}'
            '{_A}{I}'
            '{_A}{I}{M}'
            '{_i}{e}'
            '{_A}{o}'
            '{_A}{i}{e}'
            '{_A}{k}{r}'

            /* Suffixes with a leading implicit a: */
            '{w}{_A}{e}{M}' CONSONANT
            '{w}{_A}{o}{M}' CONSONANT
            '{n}{_A}{e}{M}' CONSONANT
            '{n}{_A}{o}{M}' CONSONANT
            '{w}{_A}' CONSONANT
            '{w}{_I}' CONSONANT
            '{w}{_I}{M}' CONSONANT
            '{w}{_e}' CONSONANT
            '{n}{_A}' CONSONANT
            '{n}{_I}' CONSONANT
            '{n}{_e}' CONSONANT
            '{k}{r}' CONSONANT
        )
        delete
    )
)
